North Dakota statutes. TITLE 15 Education
CHAPTER 15-62.5 Scholars Program

15-62.5-01.
Scholars program.

The state board of higher education shall administer the scholars program for the purpose of providing a merit-based scholarship to an individual who:

Graduated from a high school in this state;

Graduated from a high school in a bordering state, pursuant to chapter 15.1-29;

Graduated from a nonpublic high school in a bordering state while residing with a custodial parent in this state; or

Completed a program of home education supervised in accordance with chapter 15.1-23;

On the ACT or an equivalent nationally recognized standardized test approved by the state board of higher education, achieved composite scores that ranked the individual at or above the ninety-fifth percentile among those who took the ACT or an equivalent nationally recognized standardized test approved by the state board of higher education, prior to July first in the calendar year preceding the individual’s enrollment;

Is enrolled at an accredited institution of higher education in this state that offers a program of instruction equal to at least two academic years;

Because of a medically certifiable disability is enrolled at an accredited institution of higher education outside of this state that offers the individual special services or facilities not available in this state, provided the institution offers a program of instruction equal to at least two academic years; and

Is pursuing a course of study determined by the board to be full-time.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 3, § 18, effective July 1, 2015; 2021, ch. 158, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

Effective Date.

This chapter became effective July 1, 2015.

15-62.5-02.
Scholars program — Criteria and procedures.

The state board of higher education shall adopt:

Criteria governing the application process;

Criteria governing the selection process, within the requirements of section 15-62.5-03; and

Procedures for providing fiscal control, fund accounting, and reports.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 3, § 18, effective July 1, 2015.

15-62.5-03.
Scholars program — Ranking and selection of recipients.

The state board of higher education shall rank scholars program applicants by their ACT composite scores or equivalent scores on a nationally recognized standardized test approved by the state board of higher education.

If two or more applicants have the same composite scores, they must be ranked by the numeric sum of their four scale scores on the ACT or equivalent scores on a nationally recognized standardized test approved by the state board of higher education.

If two or more applicants have the same composite scores and the same numeric sum of the four scale scores, they must be ranked by the numeric sum of their English and mathematics scores.

The state board of higher education may establish additional criteria to rank applicants who have the same numeric sum of their English and mathematics scores.

Scholarships must be offered to applicants in descending order according to this ranking until available funds have been expended or until the pool of applicants has been exhausted.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 3, § 18, effective July 1, 2015; 2021, ch. 158, § 2, effective August 1, 2021.

15-62.5-04.
Scholars program — Scholarship amounts — Stipends.

Each semester, the state board of higher education shall provide to an eligible student a scholarship in an amount not exceeding the tuition charged at the institution in which the student is enrolled, provided the amount may not exceed the highest undergraduate semester tuition charged at an institution of higher education under the control of the state board of higher education.

Each quarter the state board of higher education shall provide to an eligible student a scholarship in an amount not exceeding the tuition charged per quarter at the institution in which the student is enrolled, provided the amount may not exceed two-thirds of the highest undergraduate semester tuition charged at an institution of higher education under the control of the state board of higher education.

For purposes of this subsection, the rates are calculated using a traditional fall and spring academic year.

The scholarships provided for under this section are conditioned on the student maintaining a 3.5 cumulative grade point average, based on a 4.0 grading system.

Any student eligible for a scholarship under this section is also eligible for a stipend in an amount not exceeding two thousand dollars annually. The state board of higher education may distribute the stipend on a semester or a quarter basis.

A student is not entitled to receive scholarships under this chapter for more than the equivalent of:

Eight semesters of full-time enrollment; or

Twelve quarters of full-time enrollment.

Notwithstanding subdivision a, a student is not entitled to receive a scholarship under this chapter after the student obtains a baccalaureate degree.

The state board of higher education shall forward scholarships and stipends payable under this chapter directly to the institution in which the student is enrolled.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 3, § 18, effective July 1, 2015.

15-62.5-05.
Use of scholarships and stipends — Refund policy.

Scholarships and stipends awarded under this chapter may be applied to defray tuition charges, fees, room and board charges, and the cost of books and supplies, and for any other expenses incidental to attending an institution of higher education. If an individual discontinues attendance before the completion of any semester or quarter for which a scholarship or stipend has been received, the individual is subject to the refund or repayment policy of the institution at which the individual was enrolled.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 3, § 18, effective August 1, 2015.